Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2805
Accredited school or college of pharmacy, defined.

Accredited school or college of pharmacy means a school or college of pharmacy or a department of pharmacy of a university approved by the board pursuant to section 38-2804.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 118;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.21;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 901.